Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 19.27 RCW to read as follows:(1) Within the adoption cycle for the 2024 Washington state residential code, the state building code council shall amend the Washington state residential code to adopt the 2024 international residential code appendix BM related to 3D-printed building construction.(2) Within the adoption cycle for the 2027 Washington state residential code, the state building code council shall amend the Washington state residential code to authorize 3D-printed building construction in the main body of the code rather than in an appendix.--- END ---